installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX K Y 84
SFX K   0           te         [ee]
SFX K   0           ti         [ee]
SFX K   0           tem        [ee]
SFX K   e           ata        e
SFX K   e           at         e
SFX K   e           atum       e
SFX K   e           atech      e
SFX K   e           aty        e
SFX K   e           ata        [^dnt]e
SFX K   e           at         [^dnt]e
SFX K   e           atum       [^dnt]e
SFX K   e           atech      [^dnt]e
SFX K   e           aty        [^dnt]e
SFX K   ne          nata       ne
SFX K   ne          nat        ne
SFX K   ne          natum      ne
SFX K   ne          natech     ne
SFX K   ne          naty       ne
SFX K   te          tata       te
SFX K   te          tat        te
SFX K   te          tatum      te
SFX K   te          tatech     te
SFX K   te          taty       te
SFX K   de          data       de
SFX K   de          dat        de
SFX K   de          datum      de
SFX K   de          datech     de
SFX K   de          daty       de
SFX K   0           tu         a
SFX K   0           tem        a
SFX K   0           ta         a
SFX K   0           t          a
SFX K   0           tum        a
SFX K   0           tech       a
SFX K   0           ty         a
SFX K   0           i          [^aeeiydnts]
SFX K   0           i          [^aeeiydnts]
SFX K   0           em         [^aeeiydntsmcsp]
SFX K   0           ech        [^aeeiydntsmcsp]
SFX K   0           mi         [^aeeiydntsmc]
SFX K   0           ich        [ps]
SFX K   0           im         [ps]
SFX K   0           ich        oc
SFX K   0           im         oc
SFX K   0           ech        moc
SFX K   0           em         moc
SFX K   0           ech        [^o]c
SFX K   0           em         [^o]c
SFX K   0           mi         ec
SFX K   0           emi        [^e]c
SFX K   d           di         d
SFX K   d           di         d
SFX K   d           dim        d
SFX K   d           dich       d
SFX K   d           demi       [^eeu]d
SFX K   0           mi         [eeu]d
SFX K   t           ti         t
SFX K   t           ti         t
SFX K   t           tim        t
SFX K   t           tich       t
SFX K   t           temi       [^e]t
SFX K   0           mi         et
SFX K   es          si         es
SFX K   es          si         es
SFX K   es          sim        es
SFX K   es          sich       es
SFX K   es          semi       es
SFX K   0           i          [^e]s
SFX K   0           i          [^e]s
SFX K   0           im         [^e]s
SFX K   0           ich        [^e]s
SFX K   0           mi         [^e]s
SFX K   y           ost        y
SFX K   y           osti       y
SFX K   y           osti       y
SFX K   y           ostem      y
SFX K   y           ostech     y
SFX K   y           ostmi      y
SFX K   i           ost        i
SFX K   i           osti       i
SFX K   i           osti       i
SFX K   i           ostem      i
SFX K   i           ostech     i
SFX K   i           ostmi      i

SFX Y Y 145
SFX Y   y           a          y
SFX Y   y           e          y
SFX Y   y           eho        y
SFX Y   y           emu        y
SFX Y   y           em         y
SFX Y   0           m          y
SFX Y   y           ou         y
SFX Y   a           e          a
SFX Y   a           ou         a
SFX Y   a           ych        a
SFX Y   a           ym         a
SFX Y   a           ymi        a
SFX Y   0           ho         e
SFX Y   0           mu         e
SFX Y   0           m          e
SFX Y   e           ym         e
SFX Y   e           a          e
SFX Y   e           ych        e
SFX Y   e           ymi        e
SFX Y   y           i          [^rhk]y
SFX Y   ry          ri         ry
SFX Y   hy          zi         [^c]hy
SFX Y   chy         si         chy
SFX Y   ky          ci         [^scc]ky
SFX Y   sky         sti        sky
SFX Y   cky         cti        cky
SFX Y   ky          ci         cky
SFX Y   0           ch         y
SFX Y   0           mi         y
SFX Y   0           ma         y
SFX Y   0           ho         i
SFX Y   0           mu         i
SFX Y   0           m          i
SFX Y   0           ch         i
SFX Y   0           mi         i
SFX Y   0           ma         i
SFX Y   oj          eho        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          emu        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          y          [io]j
SFX Y   oj          em         [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ym         [io]j
SFX Y   skoj        sti        sk[io]j
SFX Y   ckoj        cti        ck[io]j
SFX Y   koj         ci         [^sc]k[io]j
SFX Y   oj          i          [^k][io]j
SFX Y   oj          ych        [io]j
SFX Y   oj          e          [io]j
SFX Y   oj          ymi        [io]j
SFX Y   0           ho         [iy]
SFX Y   0           mu         [iy]
SFX Y   0           m          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ove        [iy]
SFX Y   0           ch         [iy]
SFX Y   0           u          [iy]
SFX Y   0           um         [iy]
SFX Y   0           e          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ich        [iy]
SFX Y   0           mi         [iy]
SFX Y   0           i          [iy]
SFX Y   0           ho         e
SFX Y   0           mu         e
SFX Y   0           m          e
SFX Y   e           ove        e
SFX Y   e           u          e
SFX Y   e           um         e
SFX Y   e           y          e
SFX Y   0           ch         e
SFX Y   0           ho         e
SFX Y   0           mu         e
SFX Y   0           m          e
SFX Y   ne          nove       ne
SFX Y   ne          nu         ne
SFX Y   ne          num        ne
SFX Y   e           i          e
SFX Y   e           ich        e
SFX Y   uv          ova        uv
SFX Y   uv          ovu        uv
SFX Y   uv          ove        uv
SFX Y   uv          ovym       uv
SFX Y   uv          ovi        uv
SFX Y   uv          ovy        uv
SFX Y   uv          ovo        uv
SFX Y   uv          ovou       uv
SFX Y   uv          ovych      uv
SFX Y   uv          ovymi      uv
SFX Y   uv          ovyma      uv
SFX Y   0           a          in
SFX Y   0           u          in
SFX Y   0           e          in
SFX Y   0           ym         in
SFX Y   0           i          in
SFX Y   0           y          in
SFX Y   0           ou         in
SFX Y   0           ych        in
SFX Y   0           ymi        in
SFX Y   0           o          in
SFX Y   0           yma        in
SFX Y   en          oho        en
SFX Y   en          omu        en
SFX Y   en          om         en
SFX Y   en          im         en
SFX Y   en          a          en
SFX Y   en          e          en
SFX Y   en          u          en
SFX Y   en          ou         en
SFX Y   en          o          en
SFX Y   en          i          en
SFX Y   en          y          en
SFX Y   en          ech        en
SFX Y   en          em         en
SFX Y   en          emi        en
SFX Y   en          ema        en
SFX Y   do          oho        do
SFX Y   do          omu        do
SFX Y   do          om         do
SFX Y   do          ym         do
SFX Y   co          ceho       co
SFX Y   co          cemu       co
SFX Y   co          cem        co
SFX Y   co          cim        co
SFX Y   as          aseho      as
SFX Y   as          asemu      as
SFX Y   as          asem       as
SFX Y   as          asim       as
SFX Y   as          ase        as
SFX Y   as          asi        as
SFX Y   as          asi        as
SFX Y   as          asich      as
SFX Y   as          asim       as
SFX Y   as          asimi      as
SFX Y   as          asima      as
SFX Y   uj          eho        uj
SFX Y   uj          emu        uj
SFX Y   uj          em         uj
SFX Y   uj          ym         uj
SFX Y   uj          a          uj
SFX Y   uj          oje        uj
SFX Y   uj          e          uj
SFX Y   uj          oji        uj
SFX Y   uj          ou         uj
SFX Y   uj          oji        uj
SFX Y   uj          i          uj
SFX Y   uj          ych        uj
SFX Y   uj          ymi        uj
SFX Y   uj          yma        uj
