installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
albionsky/YRN
ambiciozni/YKRN
antiepilepticky/YCR
asertivni/YKRN
assemblersky/YRN
Balasuv/Y
baryonovy/YKRN
behany/YKRN
bezchybny/YKR
bezodpadni/YR
beztvary/YKR
blafujici/YN
bloudivy/YKR
bortici/YN
brusivy/YKRN
brzdeny/YKRN
cedulovy/YR
ceneny/YKRN
ctizadostivy/YKRN
casny/YKRN
cervenobelejsi/YRW
ctyrnasobny/YKR
ctyrmilionovy/YR
degustacni/YKRN
Dejlova/Y
detailni/YKRN
devadesatilitrovy/YR
divny/YKR
dixielandovy/Y
docepovany/YKRN
dohrimany/YKRN
dohyreny/YKRN
dokuchavany/YKRN
domuchlany/YKRN
Donaufova/Y
doprogramovavany/YKRN
dospany/YKRN
dostudovavavany/YRN
dotisknuty/YKRN
dozorovany/YKRN
dramaturgynin/Y
dusavany/YKRN
duslednejsi/YRW
dvouatomovy/YKR
dvousetkilometrovy/YK
ekvipotentni/YKR
endokrinologicky/YRN
extenzifikacni/YKRN
externistuv/Y
filolozcin/Y
formativni/YKR
Frey/Y
globalisticky/YCR
godesbergsky/YKRN
Halamickuv/Y
Heligarova/Y
heterozygotnost/K
hnaci/YN
horentni/YKR
horcokvety/YR
hrejivy/YKRN
hudbymilovny/YKR
charakteristicky/YCRN
chovny/YKRN
churavy/YKRN
indiskretni/YKRN
instalatersky/YKRN
ionsky/YKRN
Jancurova/Y
jednomuzny/YKRN
jedovaty/YKRN
jitreny/YKRN
Jourova/Y
kandidatni/YKRN
kasarni/YKRN
kaviarovy/YR
klinopisny/YR
klovavany/YKRN
koledovany/YKRN
kompenzovatelny/YKRN
kongruentni/YRN
konturovy/YKR
korzaruv/Y
kozeluzsky/YKRN
krajnejsi/YRE
kryomagnetictejsi/YRW
krepceny/YKRN
kuneticky/Y
kverulovany/YKRN
ladny/YKRN
legovany/YKRN
lemuruv/Y
linkovanejsi/YRW
lipidovy/YKR
Ludkuv/Y
madeirizovany/YKRN
malinikovy/YKRN
Maskova/Y
mazavy/YKRN
mesiassky/YRN
mikroskopovany/YKRN
mimeticky/YRN
mnohorozmerny/YKR
mocovy/YR
mrakovsky/Y
mrazovy/YKR
nabehany/YKRN
nabonzovany/YKRN
nadepsany/YKRN
nafukovany/YKRN
nahnevanejsi/YRW
nakouskovany/YKRN
namezdny/YKR
naoctovany/YKRN
napovedeny/YKRN
nasluhovany/YKRN
nastrceny/YKRN
nastouchany/YKRN
navymysleny/YKRN
nedelni/YKRN
neromansky/YKR
Nevosaduv/Y
nudny/YKR
Nydruv/Y
obkladany/YKRN
oboji/YRN
obrodny/YKRN
ocenenihodny/YKRN
odbouchnuty/YKRN
oddiskutovavany/YKRN
odjimatelny/YKRN
odlakany/YKRN
odlucitelny/YKRN
odplynovany/YKRN
odskladany/YKRN
odskladavany/YKRN
odtoceny/YKRN
ofoukany/YKRN
ohniskovity/YKRN
okoureny/YKRN
omlzeny/YKRN
oockovavany/YKRN
opravovovany/YKRN
orebsky/Y
osmiclenny/YKR
ostrovni/YRN
osvindlovany/YKRN
ozdobny/YKRN
ozdravujici/YN
paprduv/Y
Paveluv/Y
perfidni/YKR
petasedmdesatnikuv/Y
pitvajici/YN
Plzenancin/Y
pobarveny/YKRN
podmetavany/YKRN
podrazeny/YKRN
pohybujici/YN
pokouseny/YKRN
polootaceci/YN
pootevirany/YKRN
popradsky/Y
postupujici/YN
posuzovatelny/YKRN
povyrazeny/YKRN
pozustaly/YKRN
prefabrikatovy/YR
produkovavany/YKRN
prohrabavany/YKRN
promenovany/YKRN
propichovaci/Y
prostrizeny/YKRN
protiburzoaznejsi/YRW
provztekany/YKRN
prtavejsi/YRW
predjimatelny/YKRN
predkonfigurovavany/YKRN
prehryzany/YKRN
preinstalovany/YKRN
prepichovany/YKRN
preplacenejsi/YRW
pretazeny/YKRN
preusporadany/YKRN
prichytnuty/YKRN
prikreslovavany/YKRN
prislazovany/YKRN
prisovicky/Y
pulsujici/YN
pykany/YKRN
rasantnejsi/YRW
renovacni/YKRN
rezignovany/YKRN
ropny/YR
rozestylany/YKRN
rozevlaty/YKRN
rozmazlovavany/YKRN
rozmnozitelnejsi/YRW
rozstriknuty/YKRN
roztancovavany/YKRN
ruznoveky/YKR
ruzynsky/YR
Sadlova/Y
sdruzeny/YKRN
sebihavany/YKRN
semifinalovy/YRN
seznamovany/YKRN
shlizejici/YN
skladatelsky/YR
sladeny/YKRN
slineny/YKRN
snimany/YKRN
sobepodobny/YKR
sparovany/YKRN
spolykany/YKRN
sprazenejsi/YRW
steroidni/YR
stranny/YKRN
strucnejsi/YRW
supermoderni/YKR
sverazny/YKR
symbolistuv/Y
skvrne/K
slechtiteluv/Y
teatralnejsi/YRW
teplokrevny/YKRN
transkontinentalni/YRN
trouseny/YKRN
Tvrdikova/Y
uctovany/YKRN
ultrajemnozrnny/YKRN
unasivejsi/YRW
usekavany/YKRN
uverejneny/YKRN
uvereny/YKRN
velmikratkovlnny/YKRN
ventilovy/Y
vlacny/YKR
vnitrni/YKRN
vsouvany/YKRN
vybihavany/YKRN
vydareny/YKRN
vyjmenovany/YKRN
vylamovany/YKRN
vymlouvany/YKRN
vyrocny/YKRN
vystrkanejsi/YRW
vyskrabavany/YKRN
vyzdobeny/YKRN
Weberuv/Y
zabubnovany/YKRN
zakalkulovavany/YKRN
zakutaleny/YKRN
zamlzovany/YKRN
zaradeny/YKRN
zasuvny/YKRN
zatopeny/YKRN
zcivilneny/YKRN
zdymaci/Y
zhospodarneny/YKRN
zlehceny/YKRN
zmocnovaci/YKRN
znovuozivovany/YKRN
zrohovateny/YKRN
Zuzanin/Y
zzenstily/YKRN
